District of Columbia statutes.
31-631

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Applicant” means an individual, or other person designated by the Commissioner by rule, applying for any of the following:

(A)

An initial license as a resident insurance producer pursuant to Chapter 11A of this title [§ 31-1131.01 et seq.], or public insurance adjuster pursuant to Chapter 16A of this title [§ 31-1631.01 et seq.];

(B)

A license or registration to be an agent, broker-dealer, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative pursuant to Chapter 56 of this title [§ 31-5601.01 et seq.];

(C)

A charter to open and operate a new bank pursuant to Chapter 7 of Title 26 [§ 26-701 et seq.]; or

(D)

A license, charter, or registration, other than those designated in subparagraphs (A) through (C) of this paragraph, as designated by the Commissioner by rule.

(2)

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

(3)

“Fingerprint” means an impression of the lines on the finger taken for the purpose of identification. The impression may be electronic or in ink converted to an electronic format.

June 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-143, § 101, 59 DCR 4069